Massachusetts, session 194th, H148.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 1 of chapter 94G of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
amended by inserting as new definitions:-
“Agent registration card”, the identification card currently and validly issued by the
commission to a marijuana establishment or laboratory employee or agent, but not to a licensee,
which shall entitle the holder to perform services marijuana establishments or laboratories.
SECTION 2. Section 12 of chapter 94G, as so appearing, is hereby amended by inserting
the following subsection:-
(i)(1) Any employee, agent, volunteer or other person required by the regulations
promulgated pursuant to section 4 shall register with the commission prior to engaging in any
on-site services to a marijuana establishment or laboratory related to the cultivation, harvesting,
preparation, packaging, storage, testing, dispensing, or transportation of marijuana. The
commission shall issue a single agent registration card to an individual, which agent registration
of 2

card shall entitle the holder to provide such services at one or more marijuana establishments or
laboratories. An agent registration card shall be valid for six years from the date of issuance. An
agent shall be required to sign and submit a self-attestation form to the commission every 2 years
from the date of issuance to verify the agent’s compliance with all agent registration card
requirements. A licensee shall verify the validity of the agent registration cards.
(2) The commission shall not require a fee for agent registration card requests made by
any social equity program participants and/or verified employee(s) of any social equity
businesses. SECTION 3. The commission shall promulgate or amend regulations as necessary to
be consistent with Section 1-2 not later than 365 days from the effective date of this act.
of 2